Wisconsin, session 2025, AB32.
do enact as follows:AB32,13Section 1. 118.40 (4) (ar) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB32,2,51118.40 (4) (ar) 3. Allow military recruiters access to high schools operated by 2the governing board as required under 10 USC 503 (c), except that regardless of the 3access the governing board provides to postsecondary educational institutions or to 4prospective employers, the governing board shall allow a military recruiter access to 5all of the following:AB32,2,76a. Common areas of a high school building while the military recruiter visits 7a high school for recruitment purposes.AB32,2,108b. A high school during a school day or a school-sanctioned event. Nothing in 9this subd. 3. b. requires a school board to allow a military recruiter access to a high 10school classroom during instructional time.AB32,211Section 2. 119.04 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB32,3,212119.04 (1) Subchapters IV, V and VII of ch. 115, ch. 121 and ss. 66.0235 (3) (c), 1366.0603 (1m) to (3), 115.01 (1) and (2), 115.28, 115.31, 115.33, 115.34, 115.343, 14115.345, 115.363, 115.364, 115.365 (3), 115.366, 115.367, 115.38 (2), 115.415, 15115.445, 118.001 to 118.04, 118.045, 118.06, 118.07, 118.075, 118.076, 118.10, 16118.12, 118.124, 118.125 to 118.14, 118.145 (4), 118.15, 118.153, 118.16, 118.162, 17118.163, 118.164, 118.18, 118.19, 118.196, 118.20, 118.223, 118.225, 118.24 (1), (2) 18(c) to (f), (6), (8), and (10), 118.245, 118.25, 118.255, 118.258, 118.291, 118.292, 19118.293, 118.2935, 118.30 to 118.43, 118.46, 118.50, 118.51, 118.52, 118.53, 118.55, 20118.56, 118.58, 120.12 (2m), (4m), (5), and (15) to (27), and (29), 120.125, 120.13 (1), 21(2) (b) to (g), (3), (14), (17) to (19), (26), (34), (35), (37), (37m), and (38), 120.137, 22120.14, 120.20, 120.21 (3), and 120.25 are applicable to a 1st class city school 23district and board but not, unless explicitly provided in this chapter or in the terms 1of a contract, to the commissioner or to any school transferred to an opportunity 2schools and partnership program.AB32,33Section 3. 120.12 (29) of the statutes is created to read:AB32,3,84120.12 (29) Military recruiters. Allow military recruiters access to high 5schools operated by the school board as required under 10 USC 503 (c), except that 6regardless of the access the school board provides to postsecondary educational 7institutions or to prospective employers, the school board shall allow a military 8recruiter access to all of the following:AB32,3,109(a) Common areas of a high school building while the military recruiter visits 10a high school for recruitment purposes.AB32,3,1311(b) A high school during a school day or a school-sanctioned event. Nothing in 12this paragraph requires a school board to allow a military recruiter access to a high 13school classroom during instructional time.AB32,414Section 4. Initial applicability.AB32,3,1615(1) This act first applies to access provided to military recruiters during the 162025-26 school year.AB32,3,1717